Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Nursing Assistants

§ 1641.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Medication nursing assistant” means a licensed nursing assistant who:

is under the supervision of a nurse holding a currently valid endorsement authorizing the delegation to the nursing assistant of tasks of medication administration performed in a nursing home;

has completed a Board-approved medication administration education program and an examination as set forth by rules adopted by the Board; and

is endorsed by the Board and authorized to administer medication in a nursing home.

“Nursing assistant” means an individual who performs nursing or nursing-related functions under the supervision of a licensed nurse.

“Nursing or nursing-related functions” means nursing-related activities as defined by rule, which include basic nursing and restorative duties for which a nursing assistant is prepared by education and supervised practice.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1642.
Nursing assistant licensure by examination.

The Board may issue a license to practice as a nursing assistant to an applicant who:

is no less than 16 years of age;

has completed an approved nursing assistant education program; and

has successfully completed the competency examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1643.
Nursing assistant licensure by endorsement.

The Board may issue a license to practice as a nursing assistant to an applicant who:

is licensed or registered in another U.S. jurisdiction; and

has met the practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the Board shall issue a license to practice as a nursing assistant to an applicant who:

is a service member or a veteran;

has received designation by the U.S. Armed Forces as a 68W Combat Medic Specialist or equivalent; and

is certified as a National Registry Emergency Medical Technician.

As used in this section:

“Service member” means an individual who is an active member of:

the U.S. Armed Forces;

a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces;

the U.S. Coast Guard; or

the National Guard of any state.

“Veteran” means a former service member who received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions from active duty not more than two years prior to submitting an application for licensure.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015; amended

2017, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1644.
Prohibitions; offenses.

A person shall not use any letters, words, or insignia in connection with the person’s name that indicate or imply that the person is a nursing assistant unless the person is licensed in accordance with this subchapter.

A person shall not practice nursing or nursing-related functions as defined in section 1641 of this subchapter without being licensed by the Board.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1645.
Renewal.

To renew a license, a nursing assistant shall meet active practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

The Board shall credit as active practice those activities, regardless of title or obligation to hold a license, that reasonably tend to reinforce the training and skills of a licensee.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1646.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit other licensed or certified professionals from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions of their professions.

This subchapter does not prohibit the performance of nursing or nursing-related functions that are incidental to their program of study by persons enrolled in approved nursing assistant education and competency evaluation programs.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to conflict with the administration of medication by nonlicensees pursuant to the residential care home licensing rules adopted by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 14, eff. May 28, 2015.